Mississippi statutes. Title 49. Conservation and Ecology
In General
§ 49-7-38.1.
Special hunting permit for youth under age 18 who have life threatening illnesses.

The Mississippi Commission on Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks shall establish a special hunting permit foryouth under the age of eighteen (18) who have a life threatening illness. This permit may be for any number of days in length but only for the class of persons deemed to have a life threatening illness by the commission.This special hunting permit for youth having a life threatening illness may occur anytime during the calendar year and for any game bird or game animal.However, the commission may not allow these permits during any time that conflicts with laws governing the taking of federally protected birds or species.The commission shall select participants, set the cost of permits, if any, the number of permits to be issued and the length of the special permits.

The commission may establish and regulate special youth hunts for all nonmigratory game birds and animals outside of the open season on wildlife management areas and on private lands for youth under the age of eighteen (18) who are deemed to have a life threatening illness.This permit may be for any number of days in length but only for the class of persons deemed to have a life threatening illness by the commission. The commission shall select participants, set the cost of permits, if any, the number of permits to be issued and the length of the special permit.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 339, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2010.

§ 49-7-39.
Special hunt for youth and persons with disabilities in Natchez State Park; primitive weapon season in Natchez State Park; commission may establish such hunts in other state parks; commission may authorize special youth hunts for nonmigratory birds; special hunting season for youth to run concurrently with primitive weapon season on deer.

The commission shall establish a special hunting season for youth under the age of sixteen (16) and for handicapped persons in the Natchez State Park. The commission shall also establish a primitive weapon season in the Natchez State Park. The selection of participants in the primitive weapon season shall be by public drawing from all qualified applications. The commission shall set the number of permits to be issued and the length of the special seasons.

The commission may also establish a special hunting season for youth and handicapped persons or a primitive weapon season as provided in this section in any other state park under the jurisdiction of the department but shall only do so upon the recommendation of the staff of the department as approved by the commission. The commission shall select participants and set the number of permits to be issued and the length of the special seasons.

The commission may establish and regulate special youth hunts for all nonmigratory game birds and animals outside of the open season on wildlife management areas and on private lands.

The commission shall establish and regulate a special hunting season for youth under the age of sixteen (16) to run concurrently with the primitive weapons season on deer.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2005, ch. 529, § 5 eff from and after July 1, 2005; Laws, 2008, ch. 552, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2008.

§ 49-7-40.
Special hunt by handicapped persons in natural area at Arkabutla Lake.

The commission may adopt regulations to provide for a special hunt by handicapped persons in the natural area at Arkabutla Lake designated by the U.S. Corps of Engineers. The hunt and any such regulations must be approved by the U.S. Corps of Engineers. The following restrictions apply to any such hunt:

The hunt shall be open to wheelchair-bound physically disabled persons;

Selection of participants shall be by public drawing from all qualified applications received;

No more than thirty (30) permits shall be issued;

The hunt shall not exceed a total of six (6) days;

A hunting license shall not be required of resident or nonresident applicants;

Any other actions the commission and the U.S. Corps of Engineers deem necessary for a safe and productive hunt.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1993, ch. 367, § 1; Laws, 1997, ch. 361, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1997.

§ 49-7-41.
Bag limits.

The commission may set the bag limits for game animals, birds and fish, unless the bag limits are established by the Legislature by statute.

The commission shall have plenary authority to set the bag limits for white-tailed deer, and promulgate any regulations necessary to facilitate the exercise of that authority, consistent with best management practices, scientific data and subject to all existing applicable laws, rules and regulations of this state or the United States of America.

The bag limit on antlerless deer set by the commission as authorized in this section shall not apply to private lands under the deer management assistance program or the fee-based antlerless program as approved by the department.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5908; Laws, 1932, ch. 123; Laws, 1936, ch. 197; Laws, 1942, ch. 250; Laws, 1956, ch. 153; Laws, 1966, ch. 266, § 1; Laws, 1970, ch. 288, § 1; Laws, 1975, ch. 375; Laws, 1990, ch. 448, § 1; Laws, 1992, ch. 453, § 2; Laws, 1994, ch. 633, § 3; Laws, 1995, ch. 592, § 2; Laws, 1999, ch. 502, § 1; Laws, 2000, ch. 527, § 1; Laws, 2003, ch. 368, § 1; Laws, 2005, ch. 522, § 1; Laws, 2009, ch. 510, § 2; Laws, 2014, ch. 306, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 49-7-42.
Training bird dogs through use of release pens and tamed and identified quail.

It is lawful at all times for any person, upon the issuance of a permit by the commission, to train bird dogs through the use of release pens and tamed and identified quail. The tamed quail shall be identified through the use of tags or dye. Permits shall be issued upon approval of the commission and upon payment of the sum of Three Dollars ($3.00) each. The permits shall be displayed openly upon each release pen. A permit shall be valid for a period of one (1) year from the date of issuance. The training of bird dogs and the taking of birds shall be conducted under the rules and regulations of the commission. The tamed and identified quail may be recaptured through the use of release pens when the pens have been properly identified by a permit attached thereto.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1975, ch. 391; Laws, 2000, ch. 516, § 66, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 30, 2000.).

§ 49-7-43.
Regulation of certain Mississippi lands purchased by federal government.

The executive director shall have authority to close all hunting and fishing within the lands contracted for with the federal government pursuant to the provisions of Section 49-5-23 for such period of time as may, in the opinion of the executive director, be necessary; shall have authority from time to time to prescribe the season for hunting or fishing therein, to fix the amount of fees required for special hunting licenses and to issue such licenses, to prescribe the number of animals and game, fish and birds that shall be taken therefrom and the size thereof, and to prescribe the conditions under which the same may be taken.

Any person violating any of the rules so promulgated by the executive director, or who shall hunt or fish upon such lands at any time, other than those times specified by the executive director, shall, upon conviction therefor be fined not less than Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00) nor more than One Hundred Dollars ($100.00), or imprisoned for not less than ten (10) days nor more than thirty (30) days for each and every offense.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5926; Laws, 1938, ch. 179; Laws, 2000, ch. 516, § 67, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 30, 2000.).

§ 49-7-45.
Certain acts declared unlawful; dismissal upon proper proof of actions for failure to register or possess boat’s registration card.

It is unlawful for any person:

To hunt, chase, kill or to pursue with the intent to take, kill or wound any wild animal or wild bird in violation of this chapter;

To hunt, take, kill or wound any game animal or game bird with a gun larger than 10 gauge;

To hunt, take, wound or shoot at any game bird:

From any motorboat or other craft having a motor attached unless the motor has been completely shut off and its progress has ceased. A craft under power may be used to retrieve dead or crippled birds; however, crippled birds may not be shot from a craft under power; or

From any sinkbox or battery except in waters of the Gulf Coast.

To wound, drown, shoot, capture, take or otherwise kill any deer from a boat.

To lend or transfer or borrow or to use or display while hunting, trapping or fishing, a license or tag of another.

To aid in the securing of a license for or to knowingly issue a license for any person not legally entitled to same.

To hunt, trap or fish in this state after the right to do so has been denied by the commission or the license therefor has been revoked.

To hunt or trap any birds, game or wild animals during the closed season.

Any person violating paragraphs (b), or (f) is guilty of a Class II offense and shall be punished as provided in Section 49-7-143.

Any citation issued to a boat operator for not registering or possessing the boat’s registration card shall be dismissed, along with all related court costs if the boat operator can verify that the boat was properly registered prior to the date of violation. A boat operator may submit a copy of his or her boat’s proper registration card, certified by the clerk or magistrate of the court holding the trial or hearing, along with all related court costs, to the court or magistrate before the date of the trial or hearing and the citation shall be dismissed under this subsection without the boat operator or the boat operator’s counsel being present.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5883; Laws, 1932, ch. 123; Laws, 1936, ch. 197; Laws, 1942, ch. 250; Laws, 1944, ch. 234, § 5; Laws, 1954, ch. 170; Laws, 1980, ch. 419; Laws, 1985, ch. 452, § 12; Laws, 1993, ch. 521, § 3; Laws, 1994, ch. 408, § 2; Laws, 1998, ch. 381, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 49-7-47.
Restrictions on hunting or catching alligators.

The commission may control, regulate and manage the taking of all alligators.

Residents and nonresidents shall be required to purchase a combination hunting and fishing license to hunt, kill or catch any alligator for sporting purposes.

Residents and nonresidents shall be required to obtain a special permit to hunt, kill, catch or possess any alligator for commercial purposes. The commission may establish a reasonable fee for an annual special sporting permit, not to exceed Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00), and may prescribe regulations governing commercial trade in alligators. Any reasonable fee established for an annual special commercial permit shall not exceed Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00). Such permit shall be good from the date of its issuance to June 30 following its date.

Any person violating this section is guilty, upon conviction, of a Class I offense and is punishable as provided in Section 49-7-141.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5883.5; Laws, 1962, ch. 186, §§ 1-4; Laws, 1985, ch. 452, § 13; Laws, 1987, ch. 430; Laws, 1989, ch. 359, § 1; Laws, 2000, ch. 516, § 68; Laws, 2004, ch. 341, § 1; Laws, 2006, ch. 369, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2006.

§ 49-7-49.
Prima facie evidence of hunting, trapping, or fishing.

For the purpose of this chapter, the fact that any person shall be found in the possession of a trap, fishing tackle, or other device of any description whatsoever used for the purpose of taking wild animals, wild birds or fish in the natural habitat of such animals, birds, or fish, or in the possession of dead bodies of wild birds, wild animals or fish within the field, in the forests or on the public highways or on the waters of this state, shall be prima facie evidence that such person is or has been hunting, trapping, or fishing.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5884; Laws, 1932, ch. 123.

§ 49-7-51.
Sale of game birds, animals or fish.

It is unlawful for any person to buy or sell or to offer for sale, exchange for merchandise, or other consideration, within this state, any game birds, game animals, or game fish, or parts thereof, named in this chapter, whether taken within or coming from without the state, except as specifically permitted by law or regulation.

It is lawful for the following items to be bought and sold in accordance with the rules and regulations promulgated by the commission:

The skins and sinew of deer and products crafted, fashioned or made from deer bones or antlers not in velvet;

Any part of a wild turkey, except the meat; and

Any parts of nuisance animals.

Mounted game animals, birds and fish may not be sold, purchased or leased.

A violation of this subsection is a Class I violation and is punishable as provided in Section 49-7-141.

Any person who buys, sells, offers for sale, exchange for merchandise, or other consideration, any wild bird, wild animal or fish that has been taken illegally is guilty of a Class I violation and punished as provided in Section 49-7-141.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5885; Laws, 1932, ch. 123; Laws, 1936, ch. 197; Laws, 1942, ch. 250; Laws, 1948, ch. 255, § 7; Laws, 1983, ch. 323, § 1; Laws, 1985, ch. 452, § 3; Laws, 1995, ch. 339, § 1; Laws, 1999, ch. 562, § 1; Laws, 2002, ch. 427, § 1; Laws, 2006, ch. 370, § 1; Laws, 2007, ch. 479, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 27, 2007.).

§ 49-7-53.
Shipment and other transportation of game birds, animals or fish.

It is unlawful for any railroad, express company or common carrier to knowingly receive for shipment or to ship any game animals, birds, or fish named in this chapter; except that a railroad, express company or common carrier may receive and carry game animals, birds or fish when accompanied by the hunter killing same and as provided otherwise in this chapter.

No person or corporation may ship, transport or carry, cause to be shipped, transported or carried, or receive for shipment, transportation or carriage, or have in his possession with intent to ship, transport or carry, or secure the shipment, transportation or carriage beyond the limits of this state, any game animal, bird or fish, except for the following in accordance with rules and regulations promulgated by the commission:

Rabbits;

The furs or pelts of beaver, opossum, otter, raccoon or other fur-bearing animals during the open season and thirty (30) days thereafter;

Skins and sinew of deer and products crafted, fashioned or made from deer bones or antlers not in velvet;

Game fish produced in a legally permitted aquaculture facility pursuant to Section 79-22-9;

Any part of a wild turkey, except the meat; and

The meat, hide or any other body parts of nuisance animals.

The offering or reception by any person or corporation within this state of any such birds, animals or fish for shipment from this state shall be prima facie evidence that such birds, animals or game fish were killed, captured or taken within the state. Each game animal, bird or fish in possession, received for shipment or transportation, or shipped or transported in violation of this section is a separate offense.

A nonresident licensee during the open season may ship, transport or carry from this state any game animal, bird or fish lawfully taken but not in excess of the bag and possession limits prescribed in Section 49-7-41.

Such nonresident licensee shall accompany the shipment or shall attach to such animals, birds or fish, or any package containing them, an affidavit in a form to be prescribed by the executive director that such animals, birds or fish were lawfully killed or taken by him and are being shipped or transported to his home and are not for sale. A duplicate of such affidavit shall be filed with the transportation company or agent thereof, whose duty it shall be to transmit the same to the executive director within ten (10) days after its receipt. Such affidavit shall be sworn to within ten (10) days after its receipt, and shall be sworn to before a person authorized to administer oaths in the state. For such purpose, conservation officers and agents of the transportation companies are hereby authorized to administer such oaths.

A violation of this section is a Class I violation and is punishable as provided in Section 49-7-141.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5886; Laws, 1932, ch. 123; Laws, 1936, ch. 197; Laws, 1942, ch. 250; Laws, 1974, ch. 569, § 20; Laws, 1983, ch. 323, § 2; Laws, 1985, ch. 452, § 4; Laws, 1990, ch. 336, § 1; Laws, 1995, ch. 339, § 2; Laws, 1997, ch. 370, § 2; Laws, 2002, ch. 427, § 2; Laws, 2007, ch. 479, § 2; Laws, 2013, ch. 514, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2013.

§ 49-7-54.
Importation and translocation of white-tailed deer into state prohibited; exception for university research facilities; commission to establish regulations governing importation with emphasis on disease prevention; penalties.

It is unlawful to import and translocate live white-tailed deer into this state, except that university research facilities may import live white-tailed deer upon prior approval of the commission. The commission shall establish regulations governing the importation of white-tailed deer with emphasis on preventing the introduction of diseases.

A person who violates this section is guilty of a Class I violation and shall be punished as provided in Section 49-7-141.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2002, ch. 377, § 1; Laws, 2003, ch. 516, § 6, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 19, 2003.).

§ 49-7-55.
Unlawful to possess, etc.

It shall be unlawful for any restaurant, hotel, club, or other public eating place to knowingly have in its possession, or to offer for sale to its patrons any game birds, game animals, or game fish enumerated in this chapter, whether taken within or coming from without the state, except that any such public eating place may prepare and serve game birds, game animals, or game fish to any persons who have legally killed or taken same.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5887; Laws, 1932, ch. 123.

§ 49-7-56.
Restaurants permitted to prepare and serve recreationally caught finfish to persons who caught the fish.

It is lawful for any restaurant to possess, prepare and serve lawfully, recreationally caught marine finfish to the persons who caught the finfish.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 418, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 49-7-57.
Possession of lawfully taken game animal, bird or fish; unlawful possession prohibited.

Any game animal, bird or fish lawfully taken may be possessed during the open season and during the closed season. Any game animal, bird or fish unlawfully taken may not be possessed at any time.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5892; Laws, 1932, ch. 123; Laws, 1936, ch. 197; Laws, 1942, ch. 250; Laws, 1944, ch. 234, § 6; Laws, 1946, ch. 402, § 1; Laws, 1996, ch. 481, § 1; Laws, 2005, ch. 389, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 16, 2005.).

§ 49-7-58.
Temporary moratorium on importation of elk, red deer, mule deer, black-tailed deer and other cervids designated as susceptible to chronic wasting disease; penalties; authority of commission.

In addition to the ban on importing white-tailed deer under Section 49-7-54, there is hereby imposed a temporary moratorium on the importation of elk, red deer, mule deer, black-tailed deer and other cervids designated as susceptible to chronic wasting disease by the State Veterinarian and crosses of any such animals into the State of Mississippi. The moratorium on importing such animals shall end upon the adoption of chronic wasting disease regulations by the United States Department of Agriculture.

Any person who possesses, buys, imports or transports any cervid that has been imported in the state in violation of the moratorium shall be subject to a Class I penalty under Section 49-7-141. Any person that imports any exotic animal into the state in violation of entry requirements or regulations of the Board of Animal Health or the Department of Wildlife shall be subject to a Class I penalty under Section 49-7-141. A second or subsequent violation under this section shall be punished by the maximum fine under Section 49-7-141. The agency issuing a permit for cervids or exotic animals within an enclosure shall revoke the permit of any person found in violation of the moratorium. If any cervid in an enclosure tests positive for chronic wasting disease or if any cervids within the enclosure have been imported from an area diagnosed with chronic wasting disease, then all cervids in the enclosure shall be deemed a threat to native wildlife and to public health and may be killed and disposed of by the state.

It shall be the duty of the Commissioner of Agriculture and Commerce, the Board of Animal Health, the State Veterinarian, the Commission on Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks, and the Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks to consult and coordinate efforts on matters related to chronic wasting disease, the prevention of the introduction of chronic wasting disease in the state and to ensure the health and safety of the public and wildlife.

The Commission on Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks and the Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks shall have plenary authority in matters related to the importation of white-tailed deer, white-tailed deer in enclosures, and prevention of the introduction of chronic wasting disease into the native wildlife population.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2003, ch. 516, § 2; Laws, 2007, ch. 516, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2007.

§ 49-7-58.1.
Regulation of enclosures preventing free egress of white-tailed deer.

The owner of any enclosure containing white-tailed deer that prevents the free egress of white-tailed deer from the enclosed area shall notify and register with the Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks. The person shall give his name, the location of the enclosure, the acreage within the enclosure, and whether any deer have been imported into the state and placed in the enclosure, and any other information required by the Commissioner on Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks.

Persons who constructed an enclosure prior to July 1, 2003, shall have until January 1, 2004, to notify and provide the information required under this section. The person shall use acceptable hunting and wildlife management practices as may be determined by the department.

The owner of such an enclosure shall comply with any testing of white-tailed deer harvested within the enclosure as may be required by the department. If chronic wasting disease is diagnosed within five (5) miles of the enclosure, the owner of such enclosure shall allow department personnel to enter the enclosure to utilize lethal collection methods to obtain tissue samples for testing. If chronic wasting disease is diagnosed within the enclosure, the owner shall allow department personnel to enter the enclosure and depopulate the white-tailed deer within the enclosure.

A violation of this section is a Class I violation and is punishable as provided in Section 49-7-141.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2003, ch. 516, § 7; Laws, 2007, ch. 516, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2007.

§ 49-7-58.2.
Program of inspecting, monitoring, testing and preventing chronic wasting disease.

The Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks shall develop and implement a program for inspecting, monitoring, testing and preventing chronic wasting disease. The Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks is authorized to require the chronic wasting disease testing of white-tailed deer harvested within any enclosure. If chronic wasting disease is diagnosed in white-tailed deer within an enclosure, the department is authorized to enter the enclosure and depopulate the white-tailed deer within the enclosure. If chronic wasting disease is diagnosed within five (5) miles of the enclosure, the department is authorized to enter the enclosure and utilize lethal collection methods to obtain tissue samples.

If a live test for chronic wasting disease is developed, the department is authorized to conduct such tests on white-tailed deer within any enclosure.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2003, ch. 516, § 8, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 19, 2003.).

§ 49-7-58.3.
Regulation of hunting of nonnative cervids in noncommercial wildlife enclosures.

The commission may regulate the hunting of nonnative cervids in noncommercial wildlife enclosures, and the Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks may enforce such regulations and laws in the same manner as commercial wildlife enclosures as provided in Section 49-11-25.

A violation of this section is a Class I violation and punishable as provided in Section 49-7-141.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2003, ch. 516, § 10; reenacted and amended, Laws, 2005, ch. 530, § 1; Laws, 2007, ch. 399, § 1; Laws, 2009, ch. 523, § 1; Laws, 2012, ch. 326, § 1; Laws, 2012, ch. 422, § 1; Laws, 2014, ch. 305, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 49-7-58.4.
Regulation of commercial and noncommercial wild animal enclosures and facilities preventing free ingress and egress of native and nonnative cervids.

The Commission on Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks and the Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks shall have plenary power to regulate all commercial and noncommercial wild animal enclosures in order to conserve and protect native wildlife for all citizens to enjoy and to protect our recreational economy dependent on native wildlife resources.

The Commission on Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks shall regulate any facility that prevents the free ingress and egress of native or nonnative cervids as the same are defined by the commission. The commission may promulgate rules and regulations requiring the issuance of permits and the payment of a reasonable fee therefor. Regulations promulgated under this authority must have a majority vote of the commission to be adopted.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2006, ch. 601, § 1; Laws, 2009, ch. 523, § 2; Laws, 2012, ch. 326, § 2; Laws, 2014, ch. 305, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 49-7-59.
Hours for hunting.

It is unlawful for any person to hunt any wild animal or wild bird during the night from one-half (1/2) hour after sunset to one-half (1/2) hour before sunrise, either with or without the use of a light, except:

Beavers, bobcats, fox, opossums, nutria and raccoons; and

Coyotes by a landowner, agricultural leaseholder or his designated agent on lands owned or leased by the owner or leaseholder.

The commission shall prescribe the weapons that may be used to hunt game under this section.

A violation of this section is a Class II violation and is punishable as provided in Section 49-7-143.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5893; Laws, 1932, ch. 123; Laws, 1968, ch. 260, § 1; Laws, 1980, ch. 516; Laws, 1985, ch. 452, § 14; Laws, 1996, ch. 486, § 4; Laws, 2005, ch. 373, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 15, 2005.).

§ 49-7-61.
Hunting on Sabbath.

If any person shall hunt within one-fourth (1/4) mile of any church on Sunday while worship services are being held, he shall, on conviction be fined not less than Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00) nor more than One Hundred Dollars ($100.00).

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 64, art. 229; 1871, § 2683; 1880, § 2952; 1892, § 1294; 1906, § 1369; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1105; 1930, § 1134; 1942, § 2371; Laws, 1983, ch. 356, eff from and after July 1, 1983.

§ 49-7-63.
Use of traps, nets, etc., prohibited.

It shall be unlawful for any person at any time to capture wild fowl or game birds by the use of traps, nets or other contrivances, except as provided by this chapter.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5894; Laws, 1932, ch. 123.

§ 49-7-65.
Unlawful to hunt, when.

Except as provided in this chapter, it is unlawful for any person to hunt, trap, take, kill, wound or capture, or attempt to hunt, trap, take, kill, wound or capture any fur-bearing animals except during the open season prescribed by law or regulation. However, mink may be hunted with dogs during the season for taking of fur-bearing animals on payment of trapper’s license fee by person so hunting mink with dogs.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5888; Laws, 1932, ch. 123; Laws, 1954, ch. 176, § 1; Laws, 2005, ch. 489, § 2; Laws, 2013, ch. 514, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2013.

§ 49-7-67.
Unlawful to sell, when.

It shall be unlawful for any person to buy, sell or offer for sale the pelt of any fur-bearing animal knowing that the same has been unlawfully taken.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5889; Laws, 1932, ch. 123.

§ 49-7-68.
Unlawful to engage in computer-assisted remote hunting; penalties.

For purposes of this section:

“Computer-assisted remote hunting” means the use of a computer or any other device, equipment or software to remotely control the aiming and discharge of archery equipment, firearms or primitive firearms to take any game animal or bird.

“Facility for computer-assisted remote hunting” means the real property and improvements on the property to facilitate computer-assisted remote hunting.

It is unlawful for a person to engage in computer-assisted remote hunting.

It is unlawful for a person to provide or operate a facility for computer-assisted remote hunting if the game animal or bird being hunted is located in this state.

A person violating this section is guilty of a Class I offense and shall be punished as provided under Section 49-7-141. Each game animal or bird killed in the violation of this section is a separate offense.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2006, ch. 418, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2006.

§ 49-7-69.
Use of explosives and chemicals prohibited.

It shall be unlawful for any person in the taking or killing of fur-bearing animals or fish to use poison, explosives or chemicals of any description.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5890; Laws, 1932, ch. 123.

§ 49-7-71.
Unlawful to disturb traps.

It shall be unlawful for any person to disturb the traps of another or to take any fur-bearing animals from them unless specifically authorized by the owner and any person so doing shall be guilty of larceny, or trespass as the case may be, and punishable as provided by law.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5891, Laws, 1932, ch. 123.

§ 49-7-73.
Unlawful to disturb nests or eggs.

It shall be unlawful to needlessly disturb or to destroy the nests of birds or their eggs. A violation of this section is a Class II violation and is punishable as provided in Section 49-7-143.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5895: Laws, 1932, ch. 123; Laws, 1985, ch. 452 § 15, eff from and after July 1, 1985.

§ 49-7-75.
Unlawful to fire woods, when.

It shall be unlawful during the nesting season of game birds for any person to set fire to the woods or fields other than on his own premises for the purpose of driving wild animals or birds out of fields or forests.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5896; Laws, 1932, ch. 123.

§ 49-7-77.
Game protected during high water or fire.

It shall be unlawful to hunt, trap, take, frighten, or kill game or fur-bearing animals forced out of their natural habitat by high water or fire until they have been permitted to return to such habitat by recession of such water, or the extinguishing of such fire.

All quail shall be protected from all hunting when the ground is covered by snow or when forced out of their natural habitat by high water or fire until they have been permitted to return to such habitat by the recession of such water or the extinguishing of such fire.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5898; Laws, 1932, ch. 123; Laws, 1936, ch. 221; Laws, 1964, ch. 232, eff from and after passage (approved June 11, 1964).

§ 49-7-78.
Canned hunts prohibited.

For purposes of this section, the term “canned hunts” means the practice of providing a hunting opportunity under controlled conditions in which native game animals hunted may not have a reasonable opportunity to avoid the hunter. Canned hunts are prohibited in the state. The commission shall adopt regulations it deems necessary to prohibit and control such hunts. Nothing in this section shall prohibit the operation of private shooting preserves or commercial wildlife enclosures as authorized by statute.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2002, ch. 360, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2002.

§ 49-7-79.
Unlawful to hunt on lands of others, when.

It shall be unlawful to hunt, shoot, or trap or otherwise trespass on the lands or leases of another after having been warned not to do so, whether in person or by posting of suitable notice in conspicuous places on such lands.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5899; Laws, 1932, ch. 123.

§ 49-7-80.
Releasing aquatic species or animals not indigenous to Mississippi without permit.

No person shall stock, place, release or cause to be released into any of the public waters of the state any aquatic species without first obtaining a permit from the Mississippi Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks. No person shall release or cause to be released within this state, any animal not indigenous to Mississippi without first obtaining a permit from the Mississippi Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks. The department may issue or deny a permit after it completes a study of the species to determine any detrimental effect the species might have on the environment.

The department shall establish and maintain a list of approved, restricted and prohibited species and establish rules governing importation, possession, sale and escape of those species.

This section shall not prohibit the practice of catch and release of native fish species or the release of native fish bait species.

A person violating this section is guilty of Class I violation and, upon conviction, shall be punished as provided in Section 49-7-141.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 360, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 49-7-81.
Unlawful methods of taking fish; exceptions; penalties.

It is unlawful to take or kill game fish in any manner other than by hook and line with one or more hooks, or by use of a trot or troll line. Dip or landing nets may be used when landing a fish caught by hook and line, trot or troll lines. Shad and minnows may only be taken as bait with the aid of a dip or landing net, cast nets, boat-mounted scoops and wire baskets by residents for personal use in sportfishing. However, in private ponds or borrow pits or overflow ponds which go dry in summer and cut off from the regular streams, dip nets may be used for capturing or rescuing game fish. It is unlawful to kill or take fish of any species at any time or anywhere by mudding, or by the use of lime, poison, dynamite, India berries, weeds and walnuts, giant powder, gunpowder, or any other explosive, and no nongame gross fish shall be taken by the use of nets, seines or traps for personal use without a commercial fishing license. It is unlawful to set any freshwater commercial fishing equipment so that it extends more than halfway across the width of any stream, channel, drain or other body of water, and if commercial fishing equipment is placed in water, each piece of equipment shall be placed at least one hundred (100) yards apart. The commission shall have the authority to fix the minimum size mesh for use in barrel nets, hoop nets and seines for use in the freshwaters of this state regulated by the Commission on Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks. This authority given the commission shall not be extended to the regulation of mesh size for use in marine waters. Notwithstanding anything in this or any other section to the contrary, any person in Mississippi fishing with barrel nets, hoop nets or seines in any waters of common boundary between Mississippi and another state may use a mesh size in such nets which is the same as the mesh size allowed in the other state, where the other state allows a mesh size in such nets which is smaller than the mesh size otherwise allowable in Mississippi.

It is unlawful for any person to catch or destroy fish by the use of dynamite, gunpowder or other explosive substance.

It is unlawful for any person to use a telephone, battery or any other electrically operated device for the purpose of killing or capturing fish.

It is unlawful for any person to use any chemical of any kind in any stream or any lake where the public fishes for the purpose of killing or taking fish, except that this provision shall not be construed to apply to any owner of any fish pond using such chemical in his own private pond.

It is unlawful for any person to poison any fish by mingling in the water any substance calculated and intended to stupefy or destroy fish.

It is unlawful for any person to fish any equipment in the waters of the state of any size or type that is not allowed by the commission.

Any hoop net, barrel net, seine, gill net, slat baskets, trammel net or untagged commercial fishing gear or devices being fished in public waters may be seized and held as evidence and shall be subject to forfeiture.

Any person violating the provisions of subsections (2), (3), (4), (5) and (6) of this section is guilty of a Class I violation and, upon conviction, shall be punished as provided in Section 49-7-141.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1871, § 2876; 1880, § 2935; 1892, §§ 1092, 1253; 1906, §§ 1173, 1329; Hemingway’s 1917, §§ 902, 1062; 1930, §§ 929, 1093; 1942, §§ 2158, 2326, 5900; Laws, 1886, p. 71; Laws, 1932, ch. 123; Laws, 1938, ch. 178; Laws, 1942, chs. 250, 254; Laws, 1948, ch. 255, § 8; Laws, 1952, ch. 189; Laws, 1980, ch. 362; Laws, 1985, ch. 452, § 5; Laws, 1988, ch. 381; Laws, 1998, ch. 409, § 2; Laws, 2003, ch. 402, § 1; Laws, 2008, ch. 471, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2008.

§ 49-7-83.
Unlawful not to return to water game fish taken by net.

It shall be unlawful for any person to fail to return to the water, immediately, any game fish taken by net or seines or other contrivances used for the taking of fish not classified as game fish.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5902; Laws, 1932, ch. 123; Laws, 1938, ch. 178; Laws, 1942, ch. 250; Laws, 1948, ch. 255, § 10.

§ 49-7-85.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 1985, ch. 379, § 1, effective from and after March 21, 1985.

[Codes, 1942, § 5902,5; Laws, 1952, ch. 190, §§ 1-4; 1954; Laws, 1954, ch. 169; Laws, 1968, ch. 261, § 1]

§ 49-7-87.
Fish, sale of, unlawful, when.

It is unlawful for any person to sell, offer for sale or exchange any game fish enumerated in this chapter whether taken within or coming from without the state.

The Department of Agriculture and Commerce may issue a permit to the owner of a private pond to sell fish grown or cultivated for stocking purposes only under such regulations as the Department of Agriculture and Commerce may deem necessary.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5903; Laws, 1932, ch. 123; Laws, 2002, ch. 372, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2002.

§ 49-7-89.
Fish dealers not to possess.

It shall be unlawful for any fish dealer to buy, sell, or offer to buy or sell, or to knowingly have in possession any of the game fish enumerated in this chapter whether taken within or coming from without the state.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5905; Laws, 1932, ch. 123.